Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.415

Cemeteries—Burial sites—Centralized database.

The department of archaeology and historic preservation shall develop and maintain a centralized database and geographic information systems spatial layer of all known cemeteries and known sites of burials of human remains in Washington state. The information in the database is subject to public disclosure, except as provided in RCW 42.56.300; exempt information is available by confidentiality agreement to federal, state, and local agencies for purposes of environmental review, and to tribes in order to participate in environmental review, protect their ancestors, and perpetuate their cultures.

Information provided to state and local agencies under this section is subject to public disclosure, except as provided in RCW 42.56.300.

[ 2008 c 275 s 6.]

NOTES:

Reporting requirements—2008 c 275: See note following RCW 68.50.645.